District of Columbia statutes.
16-1107

Several judgments against defendants occupying distinct parcels.

When it appears on the trial in an action of ejectment that some of the defendants occupy distinct parcels of the property claimed, in severalty, the plaintiff, if entitled to recover, may in the discretion of the court, have several judgments against the respective parties, according to the proof of occupancy.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 565, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1107.
1973 Ed., § 16-1107.